Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-38] Protective order. (a)
After a petition has been filed with the court under this chapter, the court,
upon such hearing as the court deems to be appropriate, may issue a protective
order to restrain any party from contacting, threatening, or physically abusing
any other party or a child, if the court finds that a protective order is
necessary to prevent domestic abuse (as that term and its component terms are
defined in section 586-1) or a recurrence of domestic abuse.

(b) The protective order shall enjoin a party
to be restrained from performing any combination of the following acts:

(1) Contacting, threatening, or physically abusing
any protected party or child;

(2) Contacting, threatening, or physically abusing
any person residing at the dwelling or residence of any protected party or
child; and

(3) Entering or visiting the dwelling or residence of
any protected party or child.

(c) The protective order may provide for
further relief as the court deems necessary to prevent the occurrence or
recurrence of domestic abuse.

(d) The protective order may require a party
to leave the party's dwelling or residence during the period of time in which
the protective order is in effect.

(e) The protective order shall be binding upon
not only any party against whom the protective order is directed, but also upon
each such party's officers, agents, servants, employees, attorneys, and any
other persons in active concert or participation with each such party.

(f) The court may order that an individual be
made a party for the limited purpose of issuing a protective order against that
individual.

(g) Upon application and a hearing, the court
may modify the terms of, or terminate, an existing protective order.

(h) Any party may provide to appropriate law
enforcement authorities a copy of a protective order issued pursuant to this
section.

(i) The protective order shall become
effective upon service pursuant to section 587A-39(a). [L 2010, c 135, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next